Utah statutes.
62A-15-704.   Invasive treatment -- Due process proceedings.

(1)  For purposes of this section, "invasive treatment" means treatment in which a constitutionally protected liberty or privacy interest may be affected, including antipsychotic medication, electroshock therapy, and psychosurgery.

(2)  The requirements of this section apply to all children receiving services or treatment from a local mental health authority, its designee, or its provider regardless of whether a local mental health authority has physical custody of the child or the child is receiving outpatient treatment from the local authority, its designee, or provider.

(3) (a)  The division shall promulgate rules, in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, establishing due process procedures for children prior to any invasive treatment as follows:

(i)  with regard to antipsychotic medications, if either the parent or child disagrees with that treatment, a due process proceeding shall be held in compliance with the procedures established under this Subsection (3);

(ii)  with regard to psychosurgery and electroshock therapy, a due process proceeding shall be conducted pursuant to the procedures established under this Subsection (3), regardless of whether the parent or child agree or disagree with the treatment; and

(iii)  other possible invasive treatments may be conducted unless either the parent or child disagrees with the treatment, in which case a due process proceeding shall be conducted pursuant to the procedures established under this Subsection (3).

(b)  In promulgating the rules required by Subsection (3)(a), the division shall consider the advisability of utilizing an administrative law judge, court proceedings, a neutral and detached fact finder, and other methods of providing due process for the purposes of this section.  The division shall also establish the criteria and basis for determining when invasive treatment should be administered.

